Maryland, session 2025, HB0108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the part designation “Part II. Abortion Procedures” immediately preceding Section
20–207; the part designation “Part III. Information” immediately preceding Section
20–211; and the part designation “Part IV. Effect of Refusal to Participate or Refer”
immediately preceding Section 20–214 of Article – Health – General of the Annotated Code
of Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Health – General
[20–207.] 20–201.
(A) In [Part II of] this subtitle[, “qualified provider”] THE FOLLOWING WORDS
HAVE THE MEANINGS INDICATED.
(B) “FETAL HEARTBEAT” MEANS CARDIAC ACTIVITY OR THE STEADY AND
REPETITIVE RHYTHMIC CONTRACTION OF THE FETAL HEART WITHIN THE
GESTATIONAL SAC.
(C) “GESTATIONAL AGE” MEANS THE AMOUNT OF TIME THAT HAS ELAPSED
FROM THE FIRST DAY OF THE PREGNANT WOMAN’S LAST MENSTRUAL PERIOD.
(D) “GESTATIONAL SAC” MEANS THE STRUCTURE THAT COMPRISES THE
EXTRAEMBRYONIC MEMBRANES THAT ENVELOP A BABY AND THAT IS TYPICALLY
VISIBLE BY ULTRASOUND AFTER THE 4TH WEEK OF PREGNANCY.
(E) “PHYSICIAN” means an individual[:
(1) Who] WHO is licensed[, certified, or otherwise authorized by law] to
practice MEDICINE in the State[; and
(2) For whom the performance of an abortion is within the scope of the
individual’s license or certification] UNDER TITLE 14 OF THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS
ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 108 3
(F) “PREGNANCY” MEANS THE HUMAN FEMALE REPRODUCTIVE CONDITION
THAT:
(1) BEGINS WITH FERTILIZATION;
(2) OCCURS WHEN THE WOMAN IS CARRYING THE DEVELOPING BABY;
AND
(3) IS CALCULATED FROM THE FIRST DAY OF THE WOMAN’S LAST
MENSTRUAL PERIOD.
(G) “STANDARD MEDICAL PRACTICE” MEANS THE DEGREE OF SKILL, CARE,
AND DILIGENCE THAT AN OBSTETRICIAN OF ORDINARY JUDGMENT, LEARNING, AND
SKILL WOULD EMPLOY IN SIMILAR CIRCUMSTANCES.
20–202.
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS, ACCORDING TO CONTEMPORARY MEDICAL
RESEARCH, THAT:
(1) FETAL HEARTBEAT HAS BECOME A KEY MEDICAL PREDICTOR
THAT A BABY WILL REACH LIVE BIRTH;
(2) CARDIAC ACTIVITY BEGINS AT A BIOLOGICALLY IDENTIFIABLE
MOMENT IN TIME, NORMALLY WHEN THE FETAL HEART IS FORMED IN THE
GESTATIONAL SAC;
(3) THE STATE HAS A COMPELLING INTEREST FROM THE OUTSET OF
A WOMAN’S PREGNANCY IN PROTECTING THE HEALTH OF THE WOMAN AND THE LIFE
OF THE BABY; AND
(4) TO MAKE AN INFORMED CHOICE ABOUT WHETHER TO CONTINUE
HER PREGNANCY, THE PREGNANT WOMAN HAS A COMPELLING INTEREST IN
KNOWING THE LIKELIHOOD OF HER BABY SURVIVING TO FULL–TERM BIRTH BASED
ON THE PRESENCE OF CARDIAC ACTIVITY.
[20–208.] 20–203.
An abortion must be performed by a [qualified provider] PHYSICIAN.
20–204.
(A) FOR THE PURPOSES OF DETERMINING THE PRESENCE OF A FETAL
HEARTBEAT UNDER THIS SECTION, “STANDARD MEDICAL PRACTICE” INCLUDES

HOUSE BILL 108
EMPLOYING THE APPROPRIATE MEANS OF DETECTING A HEARTBEAT BASED ON THE
ESTIMATED GESTATIONAL AGE OF THE BABY AND THE CONDITION OF THE WOMAN
AND HER PREGNANCY.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTIONS (D) AND (E) OF THIS SECTION, A
PHYSICIAN MAY NOT KNOWINGLY PERFORM OR INDUCE OR ATTEMPT TO PERFORM
OR INDUCE AN ABORTION ON A PREGNANT WOMAN:
(1) BEFORE A PHYSICIAN DETERMINES IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION WHETHER THE BABY HAS A DETECTABLE
HEARTBEAT; AND
(2) IF THE PHYSICIAN DETERMINES THAT THE BABY HAS A
DETECTABLE HEARTBEAT.
(C) (1) TO DETERMINE WHETHER A BABY HAS A DETECTABLE
HEARTBEAT, A PHYSICIAN SHALL USE A TEST THAT IS:
(I) CONSISTENT WITH THE PHYSICIAN’S GOOD FAITH AND
REASONABLE UNDERSTANDING OF STANDARD MEDICAL PRACTICE; AND
(II) APPROPRIATE FOR THE ESTIMATED GESTATIONAL AGE OF
THE BABY AND THE CONDITION OF THE PREGNANT WOMAN AND HER PREGNANCY.
(2) A PHYSICIAN MAKING A DETERMINATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL RECORD IN THE PREGNANT WOMAN’S MEDICAL
RECORD:
(I) THE ESTIMATED GESTATIONAL AGE OF THE BABY;
(II) THE METHOD USED TO ESTIMATE THE GESTATIONAL AGE;
AND
(III) THE TEST USED FOR DETECTING A FETAL HEARTBEAT,
INCLUDING THE DATE, TIME, AND RESULTS OF THE TEST.
(D) SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A PHYSICIAN
WHO PERFORMS OR INDUCES AN ABORTION IF THE PHYSICIAN:
(1) BELIEVES THAT A MEDICAL EMERGENCY EXISTS THAT PREVENTS
COMPLIANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 20–205 OF THIS

HOUSE BILL 108 5
SUBTITLE.
(E) A PHYSICIAN IS NOT IN VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION
IF:
(1) THE PHYSICIAN COMPLIES WITH SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(2) THE METHOD USED TO TEST FOR THE PRESENCE OF A FETAL
HEARTBEAT DOES NOT DETECT A HEARTBEAT.
(F) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) CREATE OR RECOGNIZE A RIGHT TO ABORTION BEFORE A FETAL
HEARTBEAT IS DETECTED;
(2) AUTHORIZE THE INITIATION OF A CAUSE OF ACTION AGAINST OR
THE PROSECUTION OF A WOMAN ON WHOM AN ABORTION IS PERFORMED OR
INDUCED OR ATTEMPTED TO BE PERFORMED OR INDUCED IN VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION;
(3) WHOLLY OR PARTLY REPEAL, EITHER EXPRESSLY OR BY
IMPLICATION, ANY OTHER STATUTE THAT REGULATES OR PROHIBITS ABORTION; OR
(4) RESTRICT A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION FROM REGULATING OR
PROHIBITING ABORTION IN A MANNER THAT IS AT LEAST AS STRINGENT AS THE
LAWS OF THE STATE.
20–205.
(A) IF AN ABORTION IS PERFORMED OR INDUCED ON A PREGNANT WOMAN
BECAUSE OF A MEDICAL EMERGENCY, THE PHYSICIAN WHO PERFORMS OR INDUCES
THE ABORTION SHALL EXECUTE A WRITTEN DOCUMENT THAT:
(1) CERTIFIES THE ABORTION IS NECESSARY DUE TO A MEDICAL
EMERGENCY; AND
(2) SPECIFIES THE WOMAN’S MEDICAL CONDITION REQUIRING THE
ABORTION.
(B) A PHYSICIAN SHALL:
(1) INCLUDE THE DOCUMENT EXECUTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF

HOUSE BILL 108
THIS SECTION IN THE PREGNANT WOMAN’S MEDICAL RECORD; AND
(2) MAINTAIN A COPY OF THE DOCUMENT IN THE PHYSICIAN’S
PRACTICE RECORDS.
(C) A PHYSICIAN WHO PERFORMS OR INDUCES AN ABORTION ON A
PREGNANT WOMAN SHALL:
(1) IF THE ABORTION IS PERFORMED OR INDUCED TO PRESERVE THE
HEALTH OF THE PREGNANT WOMAN, EXECUTE A WRITTEN DOCUMENT THAT:
(I) SPECIFIES THE MEDICAL CONDITION THE ABORTION IS
ASSERTED TO ADDRESS; AND
(II) PROVIDES THE MEDICAL RATIONALE FOR THE PHYSICIAN’S
CONCLUSION THAT THE ABORTION IS NECESSARY TO ADDRESS THE MEDICAL
CONDITION; OR
(2) FOR AN ABORTION OTHER THAN AN ABORTION DESCRIBED IN
ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, SPECIFY IN A WRITTEN DOCUMENT THAT MATERNAL
HEALTH IS NOT A PURPOSE OF THE ABORTION.
(D) THE PHYSICIAN SHALL MAINTAIN A COPY OF A DOCUMENT EXECUTED
UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION IN THE PHYSICIAN’S PRACTICE RECORDS.
20–206.
(A) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THE
REQUIREMENTS OF §§ 20–204 AND 20–205 OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE ENFORCED
EXCLUSIVELY THROUGH THE PRIVATE CIVIL ACTIONS ESTABLISHED IN § 20–207 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) ENFORCEMENT OF § 20–204 OR § 20–205 OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY
NOT BE TAKEN OR THREATENED BY THE STATE, A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE
STATE, A STATE’S ATTORNEY, OR AN EXECUTIVE OR ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICER OR
EMPLOYEE OF THE STATE OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE AGAINST
ANY PERSON, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 20–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) LEGALIZE THE CONDUCT PROHIBITED BY THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) LIMIT IN ANY WAY OR AFFECT THE AVAILABILITY OF A REMEDY

HOUSE BILL 108 7
ESTABLISHED BY § 20–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(3) LIMIT THE ENFORCEABILITY OF ANY OTHER LAWS THAT
REGULATE OR PROHIBIT ABORTION.
20–207.
(A) ANY PERSON, OTHER THAN AN OFFICER OR EMPLOYEE OF THE STATE
OR A LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY IN THE STATE, MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION
AGAINST ANY PERSON WHO:
(1) PERFORMS OR INDUCES AN ABORTION IN VIOLATION OF § 20–204
OR § 20–205 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) KNOWINGLY ENGAGES IN CONDUCT THAT AIDS OR ABETS THE
PERFORMANCE OR INDUCEMENT OF AN ABORTION, INCLUDING PAYING FOR OR
REIMBURSING THE COSTS OF AN ABORTION THROUGH INSURANCE OR OTHERWISE,
IF THE ABORTION IS PERFORMED OR INDUCED IN VIOLATION OF § 20–204 OR §
20–205 OF THIS SUBTITLE, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE PERSON KNEW OR
SHOULD HAVE KNOWN THAT THE ABORTION WOULD BE PERFORMED OR INDUCED IN
VIOLATION OF § 20–204 OR § 20–205 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(3) INTENDS TO ENGAGE IN THE CONDUCT DESCRIBED IN ITEM (1) OR
(2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, IF A
CLAIMANT PREVAILS IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION, THE COURT
SHALL AWARD:
(1) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF SUFFICIENT TO PREVENT THE DEFENDANT
FROM VIOLATING § 20–204 OR § 20–205 OF THIS SUBTITLE OR ENGAGING IN ACTS
THAT AID OR ABET VIOLATIONS OF § 20–204 OR § 20–205 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) STATUTORY DAMAGES IN AN AMOUNT OF NOT LESS THAN $10,000
FOR EACH ABORTION THAT THE DEFENDANT PERFORMED OR INDUCED IN
VIOLATION OF § 20–204 OR § 20–205 OF THIS SUBTITLE, AND FOR EACH ABORTION
PERFORMED OR INDUCED IN VIOLATION OF § 20–204 OR § 20–205 OF THIS SUBTITLE
THAT THE DEFENDANT AIDED OR ABETTED; AND
(3) COSTS AND ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(C) A COURT MAY NOT AWARD RELIEF UNDER THIS SECTION IN RESPONSE
TO A CIVIL ACTION BROUGHT UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OR (2) OF THIS SECTION IF

HOUSE BILL 108
THE DEFENDANT DEMONSTRATES THAT THE DEFENDANT PREVIOUSLY PAID THE
FULL AMOUNT OF STATUTORY DAMAGES UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS
SECTION IN A PREVIOUS ACTION FOR:
(1) THE PARTICULAR ABORTION PERFORMED OR INDUCED IN
VIOLATION OF § 20–204 OR § 20–205 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(2) THE PARTICULAR CONDUCT THAT AIDED OR ABETTED AN
ABORTION PERFORMED OR INDUCED IN VIOLATION OF § 20–204 OR § 20–205 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A PERSON MAY
NOT BRING AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION AFTER 4 YEARS AFTER THE DATE THE
CAUSE OF ACTION AROSE.
(E) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THE FOLLOWING
ARE NOT A DEFENSE TO AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) IGNORANCE OR MISTAKE OF LAW;
(2) A DEFENDANT’S BELIEF THAT THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SUBTITLE ARE UNCONSTITUTIONAL;
(3) A DEFENDANT’S RELIANCE ON ANY COURT DECISION THAT HAS
BEEN OVERRULED ON APPEAL OR BY A SUBSEQUENT COURT, EVEN IF THAT COURT
DECISION HAD NOT BEEN OVERRULED WHEN THE DEFENDANT ENGAGED IN
CONDUCT THAT VIOLATES § 20–204 OR § 20–205 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(4) A DEFENDANT’S RELIANCE ON ANY FEDERAL OR STATE COURT
DECISION THAT IS NOT BINDING ON THE COURT IN WHICH THE ACTION HAS BEEN
BROUGHT;
(5) NONMUTUAL ISSUE PRECLUSION OR NONMUTUAL CLAIM
PRECLUSION;
(6) THE CONSENT OF THE BABY’S MOTHER TO THE ABORTION; OR
(7) ANY CLAIM THAT THE ENFORCEMENT OF THIS SUBTITLE OR THE
IMPOSITION OF CIVIL LIABILITY AGAINST THE DEFENDANT WILL VIOLATE THE
CONSTITUTIONAL RIGHTS OF THIRD PARTIES, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED BY § 20–208 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(F) IT IS AN AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE TO AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS

HOUSE BILL 108 9
SECTION IF:
(1) A PERSON SUED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION
REASONABLY BELIEVED, AFTER CONDUCTING A REASONABLE INVESTIGATION,
THAT THE PHYSICIAN PERFORMING OR INDUCING THE ABORTION HAD COMPLIED
OR WOULD COMPLY WITH § 20–204 OR § 20–205 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(2) A PERSON SUED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(3) OF THIS SECTION
REASONABLY BELIEVED, AFTER CONDUCTING A REASONABLE INVESTIGATION,
THAT THE PHYSICIAN PERFORMING OR INDUCING THE ABORTION WOULD COMPLY
WITH § 20–204 OR § 20–205 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(G) THE DEFENDANT HAS THE BURDEN OF PROVING AN AFFIRMATIVE
DEFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE
EVIDENCE.
(H) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO IMPOSE LIABILITY ON ANY
SPEECH OR CONDUCT PROTECTED BY THE FIRST AMENDMENT OF THE U.S.
CONSTITUTION, AS MADE APPLICABLE TO THE STATES THROUGH THE U.S.
SUPREME COURT’S INTERPRETATION OF THE FOURTEENTH AMENDMENT OF THE
U.S. CONSTITUTION, OR BY ARTICLE 40 OF THE MARYLAND DECLARATION OF
RIGHTS.
(I) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THE STATE,
A STATE OFFICIAL, OR A STATE’S ATTORNEY MAY NOT INTERVENE IN AN ACTION
BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT A
PERSON FROM FILING AN AMICUS CURIAE BRIEF IN AN ACTION.
(J) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A COURT MAY NOT
AWARD COSTS OR ATTORNEY’S FEES UNDER THE MARYLAND RULES OF CIVIL
PROCEDURE OR ANY OTHER RULE ADOPTED BY THE SUPREME COURT OF
MARYLAND TO A DEFENDANT IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION.
(K) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A CIVIL ACTION
UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE BROUGHT BY AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IMPREGNATED
THE ABORTION PATIENT THROUGH AN ACT OF RAPE, SEXUAL ASSAULT, INCEST, OR
ANY OTHER ACT PROHIBITED BY LAW.
(L) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A CIVIL ACTION
BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE BROUGHT IN:

HOUSE BILL 108
(1) THE COUNTY IN WHICH ALL OR A SUBSTANTIAL PART OF THE
EVENTS OR OMISSIONS GIVING RISE TO THE CLAIM OCCURRED;
(2) THE COUNTY OF RESIDENCE FOR ANY ONE OF THE INDIVIDUAL
DEFENDANTS AT THE TIME THE CAUSE OF ACTION OCCURRED;
(3) THE COUNTY OF THE PRINCIPAL OFFICE IN THE STATE OF ANY
ONE OF THE DEFENDANTS THAT IS NOT AN INDIVIDUAL; OR
(4) THE COUNTY OF RESIDENCE FOR THE CLAIMANT IF THE
CLAIMANT IS AN INDIVIDUAL RESIDING IN THE STATE.
(M) IF A CIVIL ACTION IS BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION IN ANY ONE OF
THE VENUES DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (L) OF THIS SECTION, THE ACTION MAY
NOT BE TRANSFERRED TO A DIFFERENT VENUE WITHOUT THE WRITTEN CONSENT
OF ALL PARTIES.
20–208.
(A) A DEFENDANT AGAINST WHOM AN ACTION IS BROUGHT UNDER § 20–207
OF THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT HAVE STANDING TO ASSERT THE RIGHTS OF WOMEN
SEEKING AN ABORTION AS A DEFENSE TO LIABILITY UNDER THAT SECTION UNLESS:
(1) THE U.S. SUPREME COURT HOLDS THAT THE COURTS OF THE
STATE MUST CONFER STANDING ON THAT DEFENDANT TO ASSERT THE
THIRD–PARTY RIGHTS OF WOMEN SEEKING AN ABORTION IN STATE COURT AS A
MATTER OF FEDERAL CONSTITUTIONAL LAW; OR
(2) THE DEFENDANT HAS STANDING TO ASSERT THE RIGHTS OF
WOMEN SEEKING AN ABORTION UNDER THE TESTS FOR THIRD–PARTY STANDING
ESTABLISHED BY THE U.S. SUPREME COURT.
(B) (1) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT OR PRECLUDE
A DEFENDANT FROM ASSERTING THE DEFENDANT’S PERSONAL CONSTITUTIONAL
RIGHTS AS A DEFENSE TO LIABILITY UNDER § 20–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A COURT MAY NOT AWARD RELIEF UNDER § 20–207 OF THIS
SUBTITLE IF THE CONDUCT FOR WHICH THE DEFENDANT HAS BEEN SUED WAS AN
EXERCISE OF STATE OR FEDERAL CONSTITUTIONAL RIGHTS THAT PERSONALLY
BELONG TO THE DEFENDANT.
[20–209.

HOUSE BILL 108 11
(a) In this section, “viable” means that stage when, in the best clinical judgment
of the qualified provider based on the particular facts of the case before the qualified
provider, there is a reasonable likelihood of the fetus’s sustained survival outside the womb.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, the State may not interfere with
the decision of a woman to terminate a pregnancy:
(1) Before the fetus is viable; or
(2) At any time during the woman’s pregnancy, if:
(i) The termination procedure is necessary to protect the life or
health of the woman; or
(ii) The fetus is affected by genetic defect or serious deformity or
abnormality.
(c) The Department may adopt regulations that:
(1) Are both necessary and the least intrusive method to protect the life or
health of the woman; and
(2) Are not inconsistent with established clinical practice.
(d) The qualified provider is not liable for civil damages or subject to a criminal
penalty for a decision to perform an abortion under this section made in good faith and in
the qualified provider’s best clinical judgment in accordance with accepted standards of
clinical practice.]
20–209.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT PERFORM OR INDUCE AN ABORTION ON A
PREGNANT WOMAN IN THE STATE UNLESS THE ABORTION IS VOLUNTARY AND
INFORMED.
(B) CONSENT TO AN ABORTION IS VOLUNTARY AND INFORMED ONLY IF:
(1) THE PHYSICIAN WHO IS TO PERFORM OR INDUCE THE ABORTION
INFORMS THE PREGNANT WOMAN ON WHOM THE ABORTION IS TO BE PERFORMED
OR INDUCED OF:
(I) THE PHYSICIAN’S NAME;
(II) THE PARTICULAR MEDICAL RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH THE
PARTICULAR ABORTION PROCEDURE TO BE EMPLOYED, INCLUDING, WHEN

HOUSE BILL 108
MEDICALLY ACCURATE:
1. THE RISKS OF INFECTION AND HEMORRHAGE;
2. THE POTENTIAL DANGER TO A SUBSEQUENT
PREGNANCY AND OF INFERTILITY; AND
3. THE POSSIBILITY OF INCREASED RISK OF BREAST
CANCER FOLLOWING AN INDUCED ABORTION AND THE NATURAL PROTECTIVE
EFFECT OF A COMPLETED PREGNANCY IN AVOIDING BREAST CANCER;
(III) THE PROBABLE GESTATIONAL AGE OF THE BABY AT THE
TIME THE ABORTION IS TO BE PERFORMED OR INDUCED; AND
(IV) THE MEDICAL RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH CARRYING THE
CHILD TO TERM;
(2) THE PHYSICIAN WHO IS TO PERFORM OR INDUCE THE ABORTION
OR THE PHYSICIAN’S AGENT INFORMS THE PREGNANT WOMAN THAT:
(I) MEDICAL ASSISTANCE BENEFITS MAY BE AVAILABLE FOR
PRENATAL CARE, CHILDBIRTH, AND NEONATAL CARE;
(II) THE FATHER IS LIABLE FOR ASSISTANCE IN THE SUPPORT
OF THE CHILD WITHOUT REGARD TO WHETHER THE FATHER HAS OFFERED TO PAY
FOR THE ABORTION; AND
(III) PUBLIC AND PRIVATE AGENCIES PROVIDE PREGNANCY
PREVENTION COUNSELING AND MEDICAL REFERRALS FOR OBTAINING PREGNANCY
PREVENTION MEDICATIONS OR DEVICES, INCLUDING EMERGENCY CONTRACEPTION
FOR VICTIMS OF RAPE OR INCEST;
(3) THE PHYSICIAN WHO IS TO PERFORM OR INDUCE THE ABORTION
OR THE PHYSICIAN’S AGENT:
(I) PROVIDES THE PREGNANT WOMAN WITH PRINTED
MATERIALS THAT DESCRIBE THE BABY AND LIST AGENCIES THAT OFFER
ALTERNATIVES TO ABORTION OR SONOGRAM SERVICES AT NO COST TO THE
PREGNANT WOMAN; AND
(II) INFORMS THE PREGNANT WOMAN THAT THOSE MATERIALS:
1. HAVE BEEN PROVIDED BY THE DEPARTMENT;

HOUSE BILL 108 13
2. ARE ACCESSIBLE ON A WEBSITE SPONSORED BY THE
DEPARTMENT;
3. DESCRIBE THE BABY AND LIST AGENCIES THAT
OFFER ALTERNATIVES TO ABORTION; AND
4. INCLUDE A LIST OF AGENCIES THAT OFFER
SONOGRAM SERVICES AT NO COST TO THE PREGNANT WOMAN;
(4) BEFORE ANY SEDATIVE OR ANESTHESIA IS ADMINISTERED TO THE
PREGNANT WOMAN AND AT LEAST 24 HOURS BEFORE THE ABORTION OR AT LEAST 2
HOURS BEFORE THE ABORTION IF THE PREGNANT WOMAN WAIVES THIS
REQUIREMENT BY CERTIFYING THAT SHE CURRENTLY LIVES 100 MILES OR MORE
FROM THE NEAREST ABORTION PROVIDER THAT IS A FACILITY THAT PERFORMS
MORE THAN 50 ABORTIONS IN ANY 12–MONTH PERIOD:
(I) THE PHYSICIAN WHO IS TO PERFORM OR INDUCE THE
ABORTION OR AN AGENT OF THE PHYSICIAN WHO IS ALSO A SONOGRAPHER
CERTIFIED BY A NATIONAL REGISTRY OF MEDICAL SONOGRAPHERS PERFORMS A
SONOGRAM ON THE PREGNANT WOMAN ON WHOM THE ABORTION IS TO BE
PERFORMED OR INDUCED; AND
(II) THE PHYSICIAN WHO IS TO PERFORM OR INDUCE THE
ABORTION DISPLAYS THE SONOGRAM IMAGES IN A QUALITY CONSISTENT WITH
CURRENT MEDICAL PRACTICE IN A MANNER THAT THE PREGNANT WOMAN MAY VIEW
THEM AND HEAR THE FETAL HEARTBEAT IN A MANNER CONSISTENT WITH THE
STANDARD OF CARE;
(5) THE PHYSICIAN WHO IS TO PERFORM OR INDUCE THE ABORTION
PROVIDES, IN A MANNER UNDERSTANDABLE TO A LAYPERSON, A VERBAL
EXPLANATION OF THE RESULTS OF THE SONOGRAM IMAGES, INCLUDING A MEDICAL
DESCRIPTION OF THE DIMENSIONS OF THE EMBRYO OR BABY, THE PRESENCE OF
CARDIAC ACTIVITY, AND THE PRESENCE OF EXTERNAL MEMBERS AND INTERNAL
ORGANS;
(6) THE PHYSICIAN WHO IS TO PERFORM OR INDUCE THE ABORTION
OR AN AGENT OF THE PHYSICIAN WHO IS ALSO A SONOGRAPHER CERTIFIED BY A
NATIONAL REGISTRY OF MEDICAL SONOGRAPHERS MAKES AUDIBLE THE HEART
AUSCULTATION FOR THE PREGNANT WOMAN TO HEAR, IF PRESENT, IN A QUALITY
CONSISTENT WITH CURRENT MEDICAL PRACTICE AND PROVIDES, IN A MANNER
UNDERSTANDABLE TO A LAYPERSON, A SIMULTANEOUS VERBAL EXPLANATION OF
THE HEART AUSCULTATION;

HOUSE BILL 108
(7) BEFORE RECEIVING A SONOGRAM UNDER ITEM (6) OF THIS
SUBSECTION AND BEFORE THE ABORTION IS PERFORMED OR INDUCED AND BEFORE
ANY SEDATIVE OR ANESTHESIA IS ADMINISTERED, THE PREGNANT WOMAN
COMPLETES AND CERTIFIES WITH HER SIGNATURE AN ELECTION FORM THAT
STATES AS FOLLOWS:
“ABORTION AND SONOGRAM ELECTION
(1) THE INFORMATION AND PRINTED MATERIALS UNDER § 20–209(B)(3) OF
THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE HAVE BEEN PROVIDED AND EXPLAINED TO ME.
(2) I UNDERSTAND THE NATURE AND CONSEQUENCES OF AN ABORTION.
(3) MARYLAND LAW REQUIRES THAT I RECEIVE A SONOGRAM PRIOR TO
RECEIVING AN ABORTION.
(4) I UNDERSTAND THAT I HAVE THE OPTION TO VIEW THE SONOGRAM
IMAGES.
(5) I UNDERSTAND THAT I HAVE THE OPTION TO HEAR THE HEARTBEAT.
(6) I UNDERSTAND THAT I AM REQUIRED BY LAW TO HEAR AN EXPLANATION
OF THE SONOGRAM IMAGES UNLESS I CERTIFY IN WRITING ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:
___ I AM PREGNANT AS A RESULT OF SEXUAL ASSAULT, INCEST, OR
OTHER VIOLATIONS OF THE MARYLAND PENAL CODE THAT HAVE BEEN REPORTED
TO LAW ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITIES OR THAT HAVE NOT BEEN REPORTED
BECAUSE I REASONABLY BELIEVE THAT DOING SO WOULD PUT ME AT RISK OF
RETALIATION RESULTING IN SERIOUS BODILY INJURY.
___ I AM A MINOR AND OBTAINING AN ABORTION IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 20–103 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
___ MY BABY HAS AN IRREVERSIBLE MEDICAL CONDITION OR
ABNORMALITY, AS IDENTIFIED BY RELIABLE DIAGNOSTIC PROCEDURES AND
DOCUMENTED IN MY MEDICAL FILE.
(7) I AM MAKING THIS ELECTION OF MY OWN FREE WILL AND WITHOUT
COERCION.
(8) FOR A WOMAN WHO LIVES 100 MILES OR MORE FROM THE NEAREST
ABORTION PROVIDER THAT IS A FACILITY THAT PERFORMS MORE THAN 50

HOUSE BILL 108 15
ABORTIONS IN ANY 12–MONTH PERIOD:
___ I CERTIFY THAT, BECAUSE I CURRENTLY LIVE 100 MILES OR
MORE FROM THE NEAREST ABORTION PROVIDER THAT IS A FACILITY THAT
PERFORMS MORE THAN 50 ABORTIONS IN ANY 12–MONTH PERIOD, I WAIVE THE
REQUIREMENT TO WAIT 24 HOURS AFTER THE SONOGRAM IS PERFORMED BEFORE
RECEIVING THE ABORTION PROCEDURE. MY PLACE OF RESIDENCE IS ___________.
––––––––––––––––––––––––––––––––– ––––––––––––––––––––––––
(SIGNATURE) (DATE)”;
(8) BEFORE THE ABORTION IS PERFORMED OR INDUCED, THE
PHYSICIAN WHO IS TO PERFORM OR INDUCE THE ABORTION RECEIVES A COPY OF
THE SIGNED, WRITTEN CERTIFICATION REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (7) OF THIS
SUBSECTION; AND
(9) THE PREGNANT WOMAN IS PROVIDED THE NAME OF EACH
PERSON WHO PROVIDES OR EXPLAINS THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
20–210.
(A) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THE STATE HAS
SOVEREIGN IMMUNITY, A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION HAS GOVERNMENTAL IMMUNITY,
AND EACH OFFICER AND EMPLOYEE OF THE STATE OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION
HAS OFFICIAL IMMUNITY IN ANY ACTION, CLAIM, OR COUNTERCLAIM OR ANY TYPE
OF LEGAL OR EQUITABLE ACTION THAT CHALLENGES THE VALIDITY OF ANY
PROVISION OR APPLICATION OF THIS SUBTITLE, ON CONSTITUTIONAL GROUNDS OR
OTHERWISE.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A PROVISION OF
STATE LAW MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO WAIVE OR ABROGATE AN IMMUNITY
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION UNLESS IT EXPRESSLY WAIVES
IMMUNITY UNDER THIS SECTION.
20–211.
(A) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, ANY PERSON WHO
SEEKS DECLARATORY OR INJUNCTIVE RELIEF TO PREVENT THE STATE, A POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION, ANY GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY OR PUBLIC OFFICIAL IN THE STATE, OR
ANY PERSON IN THE STATE FROM ENFORCING ANY STATUTE, ORDINANCE, RULE,
REGULATION, OR ANY OTHER TYPE OF LAW THAT REGULATES OR RESTRICTS
ABORTION OR THAT LIMITS TAXPAYER FUNDING FOR INDIVIDUALS OR ENTITIES

HOUSE BILL 108
THAT PERFORM OR PROMOTE ABORTIONS, IN ANY STATE OR FEDERAL COURT, OR
THAT REPRESENTS ANY LITIGANT SEEKING SUCH RELIEF IN ANY STATE OR
FEDERAL COURT, IS JOINTLY AND SEVERALLY LIABLE TO PAY THE COSTS AND
ATTORNEY’S FEES OF THE PREVAILING PARTY.
(B) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, A PARTY IS CONSIDERED A
PREVAILING PARTY IF A FEDERAL OR STATE COURT:
(1) DISMISSES ANY CLAIM OR CAUSE OF ACTION BROUGHT AGAINST
THE PARTY THAT SEEKS THE DECLARATORY OR INJUNCTIVE RELIEF UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, REGARDLESS OF THE REASON FOR THE
DISMISSAL; OR
(2) ENTERS JUDGMENT IN THE PARTY’S FAVOR ON ANY SUCH CLAIM
OR CAUSE OF ACTION.
(C) REGARDLESS OF WHETHER A PREVAILING PARTY SOUGHT TO RECOVER
COSTS OR ATTORNEY’S FEES IN THE UNDERLYING ACTION, A PREVAILING PARTY
UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION TO RECOVER COSTS AND
ATTORNEY’S FEES AGAINST A PERSON THAT SOUGHT DECLARATORY OR INJUNCTIVE
RELIEF UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION WITHIN 3 YEARS AFTER THE DATE
ON WHICH, AS APPLICABLE:
(1) THE DISMISSAL OR JUDGMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION BECOMES FINAL ON THE CONCLUSION OF APPELLATE REVIEW; OR
(2) THE TIME FOR SEEKING APPELLATE REVIEW EXPIRES.
(D) IT IS NOT A DEFENSE TO AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER SUBSECTION (C)
OF THIS SECTION THAT:
(1) A PREVAILING PARTY UNDER THIS SECTION FAILED TO SEEK
RECOVERY OF COSTS OR ATTORNEY’S FEES IN THE UNDERLYING ACTION;
(2) THE COURT IN THE UNDERLYING ACTION DECLINED TO
RECOGNIZE OR ENFORCE THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION; OR
(3) THE COURT IN THE UNDERLYING ACTION HELD THAT ANY
PROVISION OF THIS SECTION IS INVALID, UNCONSTITUTIONAL, OR PREEMPTED BY
FEDERAL LAW, NOTWITHSTANDING THE DOCTRINES OF ISSUE OR CLAIM
PRECLUSION.
20–212.

HOUSE BILL 108 17
(A) A STATUTE THAT REGULATES OR PROHIBITS ABORTION MAY NOT BE
CONSTRUED TO REPEAL ANY OTHER STATUTE THAT REGULATES OR PROHIBITS
ABORTION, EITHER WHOLLY OR PARTLY, UNLESS THE REPEALING STATUTE
EXPLICITLY STATES THAT IT IS REPEALING THE OTHER STATUTE.
(B) A STATUTE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO RESTRICT A POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION FROM REGULATING OR PROHIBITING ABORTION IN A MANNER THAT IS
AT LEAST AS STRINGENT AS THE LAWS OF THE STATE UNLESS THE STATUTE
EXPLICITLY STATES THAT POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS ARE PROHIBITED FROM
REGULATING OR PROHIBITING ABORTION IN THE MANNER DESCRIBED IN THE
STATUTE.
(C) (1) EVERY STATUTE THAT REGULATES OR PROHIBITS ABORTION IS
SEVERABLE IN EACH OF ITS APPLICATIONS TO EVERY PERSON AND CIRCUMSTANCE.
(2) IF ANY STATUTE THAT REGULATES OR PROHIBITS ABORTION IS
FOUND BY ANY COURT TO BE UNCONSTITUTIONAL, EITHER ON ITS FACE OR AS
APPLIED, THEN ALL APPLICATIONS OF THAT STATUTE THAT DO NOT VIOLATE THE
U.S. CONSTITUTION AND THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION SHALL:
(I) BE SEVERED FROM THE UNCONSTITUTIONAL
APPLICATIONS;
(II) REMAIN ENFORCEABLE, NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER
LAW; AND
(III) BE INTERPRETED AS IF CONTAINING LANGUAGE LIMITING
THE STATUTE’S APPLICATION TO THE PERSONS, GROUP OF PERSONS, OR
CIRCUMSTANCES FOR WHICH THE STATUTE’S APPLICATION WILL NOT VIOLATE THE
U.S. CONSTITUTION AND THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION.
[20–214.] 20–213.
(a) (1) A person may not be required to perform or participate in, or refer to
any source for, any medical procedure that results in artificial insemination, sterilization,
or termination of pregnancy.
(2) The refusal of a person to perform or participate in, or refer to a source
for, these medical procedures may not be a basis for:
(i) Civil liability to another person; or
(ii) Disciplinary or other recriminatory action against the person.

HOUSE BILL 108
(b) (1) A licensed hospital, hospital director, or hospital governing board may
not be required:
(i) To permit, within the hospital, the performance of any medical
procedure that results in artificial insemination, sterilization, or termination of pregnancy;
or
(ii) To refer to any source for these medical procedures.
(2) The refusal to permit or to refer to a source for these procedures may
not be grounds for:
(i) Civil liability to another person; or
(ii) Disciplinary or other recriminatory action against the person by
this State or any person.
(c) (1) The refusal of an individual to submit to or give consent for an abortion
or sterilization may not be grounds for loss of any privileges or immunities to which the
individual otherwise would be entitled.
(2) Submitting to or granting consent for an abortion or sterilization may
not be a condition precedent to the receipt of any public benefits.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a health care provider, a
licensed hospital, a hospital director, or a hospital governing board is not immune from civil
damages, if available at law, or from disciplinary or other recriminatory action, if the failure
to refer a patient to a source for any medical procedure that results in sterilization or
termination of pregnancy would reasonably be determined as:
(1) The cause of death or serious physical injury or serious long–lasting
injury to the patient; and
(2) Otherwise contrary to the standards of medical care.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid for any reason in a
court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or any other
application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application,
and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared severable.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.